Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-701.05
Nebraska Railway Council agreement with railroad; oversight.

The Department of Transportation shall oversee any outstanding agreement between a railroad and the Nebraska Railway Council as of August 27, 2011, including making any outstanding payment due to a railroad.

Laws 2011, LB259, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 280.